South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S51.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Encourage RFP for V.C. Summer SECTION 1.    The members of the General Assembly encourage Santee Cooper to issue a request for proposal, as expeditiously as possible, to solicit proposals from entities interested in utilizing assets associated with V.C. Summer Units 2 and 3. Such a request for proposal may be conducted in a manner to allow interested parties to provide their respective ideas and proposals. Encourage PSA to make relevant information available SECTION 2.    In order to have a meaningful request for proposal process, Santee Cooper is encouraged to take steps to make available fundamental information needed for an entity to make a proposal including, but not limited to, the legal and equitable ownership interests in the associated real and personal property and any data vaults regarding the project; provided, however, that the costs associated with these steps do not affect Santee Cooper's customers' utility rates. Consideration for PSA in RFP evaluations SECTION 3.    In evaluating responses, the members of the General Assembly encourage Santee Cooper to consider each bidder's proposal to complete construction of Units 2 or 3, or both, or any other proposal related to the assets associated with Units 2 and 3, and to consider the impact that the completion of the proposal could have on South Carolinians including, but not limited to, providing relief to the ratepayers. Transfer of real property subject to Section 58-31-240 SECTION 4.    Any transaction pursuant to this joint resolution by Santee Cooper that involves any transfer of interest in real property is subject to the provisions of Section 58-31-240. Time effective SECTION 5.    This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 6th day of May, 2025. Approved the 8th day of May, 2025. __________